California, session 20252026, AB2742.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 669 of the Civil Code is amended to read:669. All property has an owner, whether that owner is the State, state, and the property is public, or the owner is an individual, and the property is private. The State state may also hold property as a private proprietor.